src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON LASJOBL !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:X4 R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:X8 R ;
! +Sg+Gen:X4 PxV ; !^P^
! +Sg+Gen:X8 PxV ; !^P^
 +Sg+Gen:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 Px3V ;
! +Sg+Acc:X4 PxV ; !^P^
! +Sg+Acc:X8 PxV ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
! +Sg+Ill:s%> PxC ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill:X2s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Nom:%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:X5jd R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;

LEXICON HEAPMIOBL !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:X4 R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:X8 R ;
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:X4 PxV ; !^P^
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:X8 PxV ; !^P^
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:X4 Px3V ;
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:X4 PxV ; !^P^
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:X8 PxV ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
! +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:s%> PxC ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:X2s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:X8st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:X5jd R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;

!LEXICON AGADJECT !Denominal Adj's with Deriv. -ag/og
! agat:agag BEAKKAN "aged A" ;


!! !!Adverbs from adjectives

LEXICON ADVV  !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:Q7t K ;

LEXICON ADVC  !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:it K ;




!! !!Adjectives from nouns

LEXICON AGAdj  !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Attr:%> K ;
! +A: VUOHTA ; pointer to VUOHTA in GAPPUS0
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +A:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%> K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>iiddá%> Px1V ;
