src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
iešguđegemállet:ieš#guđege#málleg AGAdj ;
iešguđegeivnnat:ieš#guđege#ivnnag AGAdj ;
ruškesivnnat:ruškes#ivnnag AGAdj ;
čuvgesivnnat:čuvges#ivnnag AGAdj ;
ruonáivnnat:ruoná#ivnnag AGAdj ;
vilgesivnnat:vilges#ivnnag AGAdj ;
kamelaivnnat:kamela#ivnnag AGAdj ;
daidhámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:daid9#hámag AGAdj ;
goabbatmállet:goabbat#málleg AGAdj ;
máŋgganamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:máŋgga#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
njealjenamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njealje#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
dáččanamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dáčča#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
seammanamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:seamma#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
fiinnanamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fiinna#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
golmmaivnnat:golmma#ivnnag AGAdj ;
makkárivnnat:makkár#ivnnag AGAdj ;
dákkárgeivnnat:dákkárge#ivnnag AGAdj ;
dokkárgeivnnat:dokkárge#ivnnag AGAdj ;
guđeivnnat:guđe#ivnnag AGAdj ;
goabbathámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goabbat#hámag AGAdj ;
diekkárhámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diekkár#hámag AGAdj ;
dakkárgehámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dakkárge#hámag AGAdj ;
njealječiegat:njealje#čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
čiežačiegat:čieža#čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
4-čiegat:4-čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
7-čiegat:7-čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
čohkačiegat:čohka#čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
nákkuvuloš:nákku#vulož AGAdj ;
allavirggat:alla#virggag AGAdj ;
boahttejagaš:boahtte#jagaž AGAdj ;
bahálunddot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahá#lu7nddog AGAdj ;
buorrenálat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buorre#nálag AGAdj ;
seammamearkkat:seamma#mearkkag AGAdj "marked A" ;
bealát+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bealág AGAdj ;
4-uvssat:4-uvssag AGAdj "doored A" ;
golmmauvssat:golmma#uvssag AGAdj "doored A" ;
1-uvssot:1-uvssog AGAdj "doored A" ;
guovtteuvssot:guovtte#uvssog AGAdj "doored A" ;
viđauvssot:viđa#uvssog AGAdj "doored A" ;
ovdditjagaš:ovddit#jagaž AGAdj ;
dánmállet:dán#málleg AGAdj ;
dakkármállet:dakkár#málleg AGAdj ;
boarrásutmállet:boarrásut#málleg AGAdj ;
nuortamállet:nuorta#málleg AGAdj ;
hilbesčalmmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hilbes#čalmmag AGAdj ;
guđačalmmat:guđa#čalmmag AGAdj ;
lieggaváimmot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:liegga#váimmog AGAdj ;
seakkanađat:seakka#nađag AGAdj ;
ruonánađat:ruoná#nađag AGAdj ;
šovkesnierat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:šovkes#nierag AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
guđastávval:guđa#stávval AGAdj;
iešguhtetgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#guhtet#gielag AGAdj ;
seammaagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:seamma#agag AGAdj ;
dulpegeažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dulpe#geažag AGAdj ;
moattilahkat:moatti#lahkag AGAdj "parted A" ;
5-lahtot:5-lahtog AGAdj "membered A" ;
ovttalahtot:ovtta#lahtog AGAdj "membered A" ;
ovccilahtot:ovcci#lahtog AGAdj "membered A" ;
ruškesliikkat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruškes#liikkag AGAdj "skinned A" ;
guđalanjat:guđa#lanjag AGAdj "roomed A" ;
5-lanjat:5-lanjag AGAdj "roomed A" ;
priváhtarievttálašlunddot:priváhta#rievttálaš#lunddog AGAdj ;
dánjagáš:dán#jagáž AGAdj ;
dásseravddat:dásse#ravddag AGAdj ;
ovttajuolggat:ovtta#juolggag AGAdj ;
moattejuolggat:moatte#juolggag AGAdj ;
4-juolggat:4-juolggag AGAdj ;
eareliiggán:earelijggán AGAdj ;
eatnigielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eatni#gielag AGAdj ;
erenoamáš+v4+Use/NG:earenomáž AGAdj ;
nuppebealat:nuppe#bealag AGAdj ;
gáktemállet:gákte#málleg AGAdj ;
eanetbealat:eanet#bealag AGAdj ;
ollubealat:ollu#bealag AGAdj ;
geangebealat:geange#bealag AGAdj ;
juoppábealat:juoppá#bealag AGAdj ;
dihtobealat:dihto#bealag AGAdj ;
alitdásat:alit#dásag AGAdj ;
nanadávttat:nana#dávttag AGAdj ;
goahppilgarat:goahppil#garag AGAdj ;
čiežagearddat:čieža#gearddag AGAdj ;
ruškesmuđot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruškes#muđog AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
govdamuđot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:govda#muđog AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
čáihmemuđot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čáihme#muđog AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
galbahámat:galba#hámag AGAdj ;
olgešgieđat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:olgeš#gieđag AGAdj "handed A" ;
guovttečuolmmat:guovtte#čuolmmag AGAdj ;
logičuolmmat:logi#čuolmmag AGAdj ;
golmmagieškkat:golmma#gieškkag AGAdj ;
kassiahájat:kassia#hájag AGAdj ;
friddjaulbmilvuđot:friddja#ulbmil#vu7đog AGAdj ;
eŋgelasgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eŋgelas#gielag AGAdj ;
guđajuvllat+Sem/Veh:guđa#juvllag AGAdj ;
4-juvllat+Sem/Veh+CmpN/First:4-juvllag AGAdj ;
golmmaorddat:golmma#orddag AGAdj "edged A" ;
viđaoasat:viđa#oasag AGAdj ;
ovccioasat:ovcci#oasag AGAdj ;
guhkesjuolggat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guhkes#juolggag AGAdj ;
guovttemiesat:guovtte#miesag AGAdj ;
guđasuorat:guđa#suorag AGAdj ;
njealjesuorpmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njealje#suorpmag AGAdj "fingered A" ;
mojunjálmmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moju#njálmmag AGAdj ;
hebreagielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hebrea#gielag AGAdj ;
julivgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:juliv#gielag AGAdj ;
lydegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lyde#gielag AGAdj ;
njenecgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njenec#gielag AGAdj ;
moattigielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moatti#gielag AGAdj ;
nuppegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nuppe#gielag AGAdj ;
románigielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:románi#gielag AGAdj ;
golmmašlájat:golmma#šlájag AGAdj ;
juohkešlájat:juohke#šlájag AGAdj ;
máŋggašlájat:máŋgga#šlájag AGAdj ;
dakkáršlájat:dakkár#šlájag AGAdj ;
vepsegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vepse#gielag AGAdj ;
vuođđosámegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuođđo#sáme#gielag AGAdj ;
fuolkegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fuolke#gielag AGAdj ;
guđegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guđe#gielag AGAdj ;
goabbatgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goabbat#gielag AGAdj ;
ruonáeatnangielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruoná#eatnan#gielag AGAdj ;
jagaš:jagaž AGAdj ;
miellaváillat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:miella#váillag AGAdj ;
miehtemielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:miehte#mielag AGAdj ;
buorremielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buorre#mielag AGAdj ;
bálvalusmielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bálvalus#mielag AGAdj ;
minmielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:min#mielag AGAdj ;
máŋggabealat:máŋgga#bealag AGAdj ;
golmmakultuvrrat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:golmma#kultuvrrag AGAdj ;
riidduvuloš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:riiddu#vulož AGAdj ;
njuokčanvuloš:njuokčan#vulož AGAdj ;
oanehisáiggat:oanehis#áiggag AGAdj ;
ovddetjagaš:ovddet#jagaž AGAdj ;
geavaheaddjiguvllot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:geavaheaddji#guvllog AGAdj ;
fágaguvllot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fága#guvllog AGAdj ;
ovddeš:ovddež AGAdj ;
juogasorttat:juoga#sorttag AGAdj ;
buotsorttat:buot#sorttag AGAdj ;
golmmasorttat:golmma#sorttag AGAdj ;
moattisorttat:moatti#sorttag AGAdj ;
iešguđetsorttat:ieš#guđet#sorttag AGAdj ;
luondduvigat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luonddu#vigag AGAdj ;
rádjelihkot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rádje#lihkog AGAdj ;
skohččebealjat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skohčče#bealjag AGAdj ;
suhkkolhámat:suhkkol#hámag AGAdj ;
munnohámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:munno#hámag AGAdj ;
dánivnnat:dán#ivnnag AGAdj ;
dinhámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:din#hámag AGAdj ;
ođđahámat:ođđa#hámag AGAdj ;
uldahámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ulda#hámag AGAdj ;
imašhámat:imaš#hámag AGAdj ;
ruoŧagielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruoŧa#gielag AGAdj ;
mearkagielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mearka#gielag AGAdj ;
dološruoŧágielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dološ#ruoŧá#gielag AGAdj ;
vigat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vigag AGAdj ;
ruonááissat:ruoná#ájssag AGAdj ;
heajosávjjot:heajos#ávjjog AGAdj "edged A" ;
jurddaváillat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jurdda#váillag AGAdj ;
máŋggaárvvot:máŋgga#árvvog AGAdj ;
diekkárlunddot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diekkár#lu7nddog AGAdj ;
dokkársorttat:dokkár#sorttag AGAdj ;
áigeguovdil+A+Comp+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččabu HEAPMIOBL ;
čiežasiffar:čieža#siffar AGAdj ;
čurgesvuovttat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čurges#vuovttag AGAdj ;
vilgesvarat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vilges#varag AGAdj ;
fiskesvarat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fiskes#varag AGAdj ;
čázevuloš:čáze#vulož AGAdj ;
njealjejienat:njealje#jienag AGAdj ;
allaárvvot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:alla#árvvog AGAdj ;
ovttasoarttat:ovtta#soarttag AGAdj ;
juohkesoarttat:juohke#soarttag AGAdj ;
njealjesoarttat:njealje#soarttag AGAdj ;
moattesoarttat:moatte#soarttag AGAdj ;
iešguđegesoarttat:ieš#guđege#soarttag AGAdj ;
ovttačuvddat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ovtta#čuvddag AGAdj "fingered A" ;
jiešguhtetivnnat:jieš#guhtet#ivnnag AGAdj ;
jiešguhtetšlájat:jieš#guhtet#šlájag AGAdj ;
jiešguđegesoarttat:jieš#guđege#soarttag AGAdj ;
mihttoguvllot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mihtto#guvllog AGAdj ;
boahtteáigeguvllot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:boahtte#áige#guvllog AGAdj ;
